Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-409
Privilege of leaving jail; violation of jail regulations; effect.

The chief of police, county sheriff, or such other person as may be charged with the administrative direction of a jail or jail facility may refuse to permit the prisoner to exercise his privilege to leave the jail or jail facility as provided in section 47-401 for any breach of discipline or other violation of jail regulations. Any such breach of discipline or other violation of jail regulations shall be reported to the sentencing court.

Laws 1969, c. 208, § 9, p. 815;

Laws 1979, LB 315, § 2.